Washington statutes.
RCW 9.95.100

Prisoner released on serving maximum term.

Any person convicted of a felony committed before July 1, 1984, and undergoing sentence in a state correctional institution, not sooner released under the provisions of this chapter, shall, in accordance with the provisions of law, be discharged from custody on serving the maximum punishment provided by law for the offense of which such person was convicted, or the maximum term fixed by the court where the law does not provide for a maximum term. The board shall not, however, until his or her maximum term expires, release a prisoner, unless in its opinion his or her rehabilitation has been complete and he or she is a fit subject for release.

[ 2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 s 330; 1955 c 133 s 11. Prior: (i) 1947 c 92 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 2, part; Rem. Supp. 1947 s 10249-2, part. (ii) 1939 c 142 s 1, part; 1935 c 114 s 4, part; RRS s 10249-4, part.]

NOTES:

Intent—Severability—Effective dates—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12: See notes following RCW 71.09.250.

Application—2001 2nd sp.s. c 12 ss 301-363: See note following RCW 9.94A.030.